src/fst/stems/noun_prefixes.lexc
!! Prefixes
!  --------
!! Prefixes in the Choctaw language are bound to beginning of other words.

LEXICON Pre-N-II
 @U.POSS.1SG@Poss+1Sg+:@U.POSS.1SG@s%{ai%}^ N-II ;
 @U.POSS.2SG@Poss+2Sg+:@U.POSS.2SG@chi^     N-II ;
 @U.POSS.1PL@Poss+1Pl+:@U.POSS.1PL@pi^      N-II ;
 @U.POSS.2PL@Poss+2Pl+:@U.POSS.2PL@hachi^   N-II ;
 @U.POSS.3@Poss+3+:@U.POSS.3@               N-II ; ! this form is null
 ! There may also be another distinction in the 1pl-- hapi(m)--not sure what it$
 ! Possibly paucal (pi) vs. plural (hapi)

LEXICON Pre-N-III
 @U.POSS.1SG@Poss+1Sg+:@U.POSS.1SG@a%{mN%}^     N-III ;
 @U.POSS.2SG@Poss+2Sg+:@U.POSS.2SG@chi%{mN%}^   N-III ;
 @U.POSS.1PL@Poss+1Pl+:@U.POSS.1PL@pi%{mN%}^    N-III ;
 @U.POSS.2PL@Poss+2Pl+:@U.POSS.2PL@hachi%{mN%}^ N-III ; ! I'm not certain this one's correct
 @U.POSS.3@Poss+3+:@U.POSS.3@i%{mN%}^         N-III ;

LEXICON N-II
 0 N-II-preq ;
 0 N-II-npreq ;

LEXICON N-III
 0 N-III-preq ;
 0 N-III-npreq ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
